California statutes. Water Code
(C) A representative acting on behalf of any formally organized civic, environmental, neighborhood, business, labor, trade, or similar association who intends to influence the decision of a board member on a matter before the board.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the
 Government Code, the ex parte communications provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 11430.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) do not apply to a board action identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). This section only applies to those actions.

(c) For the purposes of this section, and except as limited by subdivision (d), ex parte communications regarding a board action identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may be permitted as follows:

(1) All ex parte communications shall be reported by the interested person, regardless of whether the communication was initiated by the interested person.

(2) A notice of ex parte communication shall be filed with the board
 within seven working days of the communication. The notice may address multiple ex parte communications in the same proceeding, provided that notice of each communication identified therein is timely. The notice shall include all of the following information:

(A) The date, time, and location of the communication, and whether it was oral or written, or both.

(B) The identities of each board member involved, the person initiating the communication, and any persons present during the communication.

(C) A description of the interested person’s communication and the content of this communication. A copy of any written, audiovisual, or other material used for or during the communication shall be attached to this description.

(3) Board staff shall promptly
 post any notices provided pursuant to paragraph (2) on the board’s Internet Web site and distribute the notice on any available electronic distribution list concerning the action.

(d) A board may prohibit ex parte communications for a period beginning not more than 14 days before the day of a board meeting at which the decision in the proceeding is scheduled for board action. If a board continues the decision, it may permit ex parte communications during the interval between the originally scheduled date and the date that the decision is calendared for final decision, and may prohibit ex parte communications for 14 days before the day of the board meeting to which the decision is continued.

(e) If an interested person fails to provide any required notice in the manner required by this section, the board may use any of the remedies available pursuant to
 the administrative adjudication provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including the issuance of an enforcement order, or sanctions pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 11455.10) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 551, Sec. 4.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Sewer Service [13288. - 13289.5.]

13288.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Adequate sewer service” means a sanitary sewer service provided by a sewer service provider that is not an inadequate sewer service, as defined in subdivision (j).

(b) “Administrator” means a person whom the state board has determined is competent and
 willing to perform the administrative, technical, operational, legal, or managerial services required for purposes of this chapter, pursuant to criteria set forth in the handbook described in subdivision (i) of Section 13289.5. An administrator may be any qualified individual, firm, or another sewer service provider.

(c) “Affected residence” means a residence within a disadvantaged community that may be subject to provision of sewer service pursuant to this chapter.

(d) “Affected resident” means a resident or a property owner of an affected residence.

(e) “Annexation” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 56017 of the Government Code.

(f) “Designated sewer system” means a sewer service provider that serves a disadvantaged community that is either an inadequate sewer service or a sewer system that has a demonstrated failure to maintain technical, managerial,
 or
 financial capacity to prevent waste, fraud, and abuse.

(g) “Disadvantaged community” means a disadvantaged community, as defined in Section 79505.5,
 or a low-income community, as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Extension of service” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 56133 of the Government Code.

(i) “Inadequate onsite sewage treatment system” means an onsite sewage treatment system that has the reasonable potential to cause a violation of water quality objectives, to impair present or future beneficial uses of water, or to cause pollution, nuisance, or contamination of waters of the state.

(j) (1) “Inadequate sewer
 service” means a sewer
 service provider that serves a disadvantaged community, has a demonstrated history of failures to meet regulatory standards for proper wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal, and may exhibit deficiencies, such as infrastructure failure, insufficient capacity, or ineffective treatment of wastewater.

(2) A demonstrated history of failures to meet regulatory standards may include, but is not limited to, multiple violations, multiple instances of noncompliance with enforcement actions, or refusal to accept compliance
 assistance.

(k) (1) “Onsite sewage treatment system” means an onsite sewage treatment system, as defined in Section 13290, that is not operated by a local agency, as defined in Section 56054 of the Government Code, or a utility regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(2) “Onsite sewage treatment system” includes, but is not limited to, a septic tank, cesspool, leach field, and seepage pit.

(l) “Provision of sewer service” means the provision of sanitary sewer service, including the collection or treatment of sewage, to a disadvantaged community by any of the following processes:

(1) Annexation where the
 receiving sewer system is a special district.

(2) Extension of service where the receiving sewer system is a city, county, or special district.

(3) Additional sewer service provided within city, county, or special district boundaries.

(m) “Receiving sewer system” means the sewer system that provides service to a disadvantaged community pursuant to this chapter.

(n) “Sewer service provider” means any local agency that provides sanitary sewer service,
 which may include wastewater collection, treatment, disposal, or any combination thereof.

(o) “Special district” means a special district as defined in Section 56036 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13289.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (4), where a disadvantaged community or residents of a disadvantaged community are served by one or more inadequate onsite sewage treatment systems, the regional board may order the provision of sewer service by a receiving sewer system to the disadvantaged community, or to all or a portion of the area within the disadvantaged community. The regional board may set timelines and performance measures to facilitate completion of the provision of sewer service.

(2) In issuing an order pursuant to paragraph (1), the regional board is not required to determine that all of the onsite sewage treatment systems
 in the disadvantaged community, or portion of the disadvantaged community, to be provided with sewer service are inadequate onsite sewage treatment systems.

(3) (A) The property owner of an affected residence may opt out of an order for the provision of sewer service for a maximum of five years for the residence from the date of the issuance of the order by demonstrating to the regional board that the affected residence is served by an onsite sewage treatment system that meets both of the following criteria:

(i) The onsite sewage treatment system was installed no more than 10 years prior to the issuance of the order.

(ii) The onsite sewage treatment system is not an inadequate onsite sewage treatment
 system.

(B) A property owner who opted out pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be responsible for the payment of reasonable standby charges to the receiving sewer system.

(C) Subsequent property owners of an affected residence that has opted out pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall have the option of opting in to the provision of sewer service pursuant to the order upon gaining ownership of the affected residence. The subsequent property owners shall have access to all financial assistance made available under this section, including connection fees and infrastructure costs, if any, available to the affected residence.

(4) The regional board shall not require the provision of sewer service to a disadvantaged community by a
 receiving sewer system if the service territory of the receiving sewer system is more than three miles away from the disadvantaged community.

(b) (1) Before ordering the provision of sewer service as provided in this section, the regional board shall do all of the following:

(A) Encourage voluntary provision of sewer service, which may include voluntary annexation to a city. 

(B) Consider other enforcement remedies specified in this division.

(C) Consult with, and consider input from, the relevant local
 agency formation commission regarding the sewer service in the affected area, the recommendations for improving service in a municipal service review, and any other relevant information.

(D) Consult with the state board.

(E) Consult with, and fully consider input from, the local government with land use planning authority and environmental health oversight over the affected area, particularly regarding any information in the general plan required by Section 65302.10 of the Government Code.

(F) (i) Notify the potential receiving sewer system and affected residents within the disadvantaged community, and establish a reasonable deadline of no less than six months, unless a shorter period is justified,
 for the potential receiving sewer system and the affected property owners to negotiate annexation, extension of service, or another means of providing an adequate sewage service.

(ii) During the period set forth in clause (i), the regional board shall provide technical assistance and work with the potential receiving sewer system and the affected residents to develop a financing package that benefits both the receiving sewer system and the affected residents by addressing the receiving sewer system’s planning and capital costs and the affected residents’ connection costs.

(iii) Upon a showing of good cause, the deadline set forth in clause (i) may be extended by the regional
 board at the request of the potential receiving sewer system, the affected residents, or the local agency formation commission with jurisdiction over the sewer system.

(G) Hold at least one public meeting at the initiation of the process established in this section in a place as close as feasible to the affected areas. The regional board shall make reasonable efforts to provide a 30-day notice of the meeting to the affected residents and all affected local government agencies and sewer service providers. The meeting shall provide representatives of the affected residents and the potential receiving sewer system an opportunity to present testimony. The meeting shall provide an opportunity for public comment.

(H) Provide opportunity to submit comments by mail or electronic
 mail during the 30-day notice period and for at least one week after the public meeting.

(I) Consider whether existing programs or alternative methods are available and feasible.

(J) Consider the affordability of the provision of sewer service to the disadvantaged community.

(2) Upon expiration of the deadline set by the regional board pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1), the regional board shall do the following:

(A) Consult with the potential receiving sewer system and the affected residents.

(B) Review comments received during the public meeting held, and
 comments received, pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1).

(3) Before ordering the provision of sewer service, the regional board shall do both of the following:

(A) Find all of the following:

(i) One or more affected residences are served by an inadequate onsite sewage treatment system.

(ii) Reasonable efforts to negotiate voluntary provision of sewer service were made.

(iii) The provision of sewer service is appropriate and technically and economically feasible.

(iv) There is no pending local agency formation commission process
 that is likely to resolve the problem in a reasonable amount of time.

(v) The provision of sewer service is an effective and cost-effective means to address the inadequate onsite sewage treatment system.

(vi) The capacity of the proposed interconnection needed to accomplish the provision of sewer service designed to serve the disadvantaged community, as determined by the regional board.

(B) Hold a subsequent public meeting in a place as close as feasible to the affected areas if a period of six or more months has passed since the public meeting held pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (1). The regional board shall make reasonable effects to provide a 30-day written notice of the meeting to the affected residents
 and all affected local government agencies and sewer service providers. The meeting shall provide representatives of the affected residents and the potential receiving sewer system an opportunity to present testimony. The meeting shall provide an opportunity for public comment.

(4) Upon the issuance of a regional board’s order requiring provision of sewer service, the state board shall do all of the following:

(A) As necessary and appropriate, make funds available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the receiving sewer system for the costs of completing the provision of sewer service, including, but not limited to, compensation for any capacity lost as a result of the provision of sewer service, by paying the receiving sewer system’s capacity connection fee at the rate it
 charges others, providing additional capacity needed as a result of the provision of sewer service, and paying legal fees. If capacity beyond what is needed for provision of sewer service is provided, the state board shall retain its rights to use the additional capacity without paying additional capacity charge fees for five years, unless it releases those rights in writing. Funding pursuant to this subparagraph is available for the general purpose of providing financial assistance for the water infrastructure needed for the provision of sewer service and does not need to be specific to each individual project. The state board shall provide appropriate financial assistance for the infrastructure needed for the provision of sewer service. The state board’s existing financial assistance guidelines and policies shall be the basis for the financial assistance.

(B) Ensure payment of standard local agency formation commission costs caused by the regional board’s order. Additional costs or fees related to provision of sewer service, including, but not limited to, other public works costs or upgrades, shall not be used to delay the provision of sewer service required by the order.

(C) Coordinate with the appropriate local agency formation commission and other relevant local agencies to document the change of organization or reorganization.

(c) The receiving sewer system shall not increase charges on existing customers of the receiving sewer system solely as a consequence of the provision of sewer service unless the customers receive a corresponding benefit.

(d) The receiving sewer system shall not charge rates to newly absorbed customers of the sewer system that are higher than those necessary to provide the sewage service.

(e) Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code shall not apply to an action taken by the state board or the regional board pursuant to this section. 

(f) The state board may develop and adopt policy, through the adoption of a policy handbook that is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that provides a process by which members of a disadvantaged community may petition the regional board for consideration of provision of sewer service pursuant to this
 chapter.

(g) Article 5 (commencing with Section 13280) of Chapter 4 does not apply to any action taken by the state board or a regional board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 982, Sec. 2.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13289.5.

(a) Before implementing the actions authorized by this section, the state board
 shall, by resolution, make one or both of the following findings:

(1) A sewer service provider is an inadequate sewer service, as defined in Section 13288, and that it is in the best interest of the customers of the sewer service provider and the State of California that an administrator be appointed to assist a sewer service provider with making improvements necessary to develop an adequate sewer system. When these findings are made, the sewer service provider shall be referred to as a designated sewer system.

(2) A sewer service provider has demonstrated a history of continued failures to maintain technical, managerial, or financial capacity to prevent waste, fraud, or abuse. When this finding is made, the sewer service provider shall be referred to as a
 designated sewer system.

(b) Following adoption of a resolution based on the findings required by subdivision (a) for identifying a sewer service provider as a designated sewer system, the state board may do any of the following:

(1) (A) Require a designated sewer system to contract with an administrator designated or approved by the state board for administrative, technical, operational, legal, or managerial services, or
 any combination of those services, to assist the designated sewer system with the delivery of adequate sewer service.

(B) To fulfill the requirements of this section, a designated sewer system may contract with administrators. Where administrator services are comprehensive, the sewer service provider may contract with no more than one
 administrator at a time. Where administrator services are limited in scope, a sewer service provider may contract with more than one limited scope provider at a time, provided that in no instance will the scopes overlap. An administrator that is not designated or approved by the state board shall not be used for purposes of this section.

(C) An administrator may provide services to more than one designated sewer system.

(D) If a designated sewer system is also a water system that has been ordered to consolidate or has been ordered to accept assistance from an administrator, the state board shall consider designating the same administrator for the designated sewer system that was designated to the water system, and requiring that administrator to consult with the
 management of both the designated water and the designated sewer systems in carrying out their duties.

(2) Order a designated sewer system to accept administrative, technical, operational, legal, or managerial services, including full management and control of all aspects of the designated sewer system, from an administrator selected by the state board.

(3) Order a designated sewer system to accept administrative, technical, operational, legal, or managerial services from an administrator for full oversight of construction or development projects, including, but not limited to, accepting
 loans and grants issued by the state board and entering into contracts on behalf of the designated sewer system.

(c) The state board shall do all of the following before determining that a sewer service provider is a designated sewer
 system pursuant to subdivision (a).

(1) Provide the sewer service provider with notice and an opportunity to show that the sewer service provider has taken steps to timely address its failure to be an adequate sewer
 system or has taken steps to timely address its failure to maintain technical, managerial, and financial capacity.

(2) (A) Conduct a public meeting in a location as close as feasible to the affected community.

(B) The state board shall make reasonable efforts to provide a 30-day notice of the public meeting to affected ratepayers, renters, and property owners.

(C) The state board shall provide representatives of the sewer service provider, affected ratepayers, renters, and property owners with an opportunity to present oral and written comments at the public meeting.

(D) The state board shall provide an opportunity for public comment
 at the meeting.

(3) Provide the public with an opportunity to submit comments by mail or electronically during the 30-day notice period and for at least one week after the public meeting described in paragraph (2).

(4) Consider whether designating a sewer system and ordering a designated sewer system to contract with an administrator is feasible, and not in conflict with any federal or state laws, regulations, or permit requirements.

(d) The state board shall make financial assistance available to an administrator of a designated sewer system, as appropriate and to the extent that funding is available.

(e) The state board shall not
 identify a designated sewer system or make findings that a sewer service provider has an inadequate sewer service or require a sewer service provider to contract with an administrator pursuant to this section on or after January 1, 2029. All other authorizations and requirements pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until December 31, 2029.

(f) The authority granted to an administrator by the state board pursuant to
 subdivision (b) may include, but is not limited to, the authority to do all of the following:

(1) Expend available money for capital infrastructure improvements that the designated sewer system needs to provide adequate sewer service.

(2) Set and collect user sewer rates and fees. The provisions of this section are subject to all applicable constitutional requirements, including Article XIIID of the California Constitution.

(3) Expend available money for operation and maintenance costs of the designated sewer system, including conducting feasibility or planning studies, or addressing outstanding technical or legal issues.

(g) The state board shall work with the administrator of a designated sewer system and the communities served by that designated sewer system to develop, within the shortest practicable time, adequate technical, managerial, and financial capacity to deliver adequate sewer service so that the services of the administrator are no longer necessary.

(h) A designated sewer system shall not be responsible for any costs associated with an administrator that are higher than the costs necessary to maintain the designated sewer system and deliver adequate sewer service.

(i) Before ordering a designated
 sewer system to accept administrative, technical, operational, legal, or managerial services from an administrator pursuant to subdivision (b), the state board shall develop standards, terms, and procedures, to be incorporated in the handbook adopted pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 116686 of the Health and Safety Code, consistent with the process provided in subdivision (a) of Section 116760.43 of the Health and Safety Code, for all of the following:

 (1) The process and criteria for the state board to designate a sewer service provider as a designated sewer system, and the evidence required to support findings by the state board in a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Ensuring compliance with subdivision (h).

(3) Providing opportunity for public comment on the selection of an administrator and the services to be provided.

(4) Providing public access to budgets, ownership and financial information, and other documents and records related to the provision of sewer service to affected residences and to the management of the designated sewer system by the administrator.

(5) Providing regular public meetings, notifications, opportunities for public comment, and other forms of engagement with customers of the designated sewer system for significant decisions or actions made on behalf of the designated sewer system, including, but not limited to, establishing operating budgets, altering sewer rates, adopting system policies, entering into long-term contracts or financing commitments, and
 developing system projects or plans.

(6) Formal requests to the state board to reverse or modify a decision of an administrator or to request substitution of an administrator.

(7) Ensuring an administrator acts in the best interests of the community served.

(8) Development and approval of a post-administrator sewer service plan to ensure compliance with subdivision (g). Development of the plan shall include, but is not limited to, an evaluation of long-term public governance or community ownership options.

(9) The process for the state board to determine an administrator is no longer
 needed and to terminate the administrator’s responsibilities.

(j) An administrator appointed pursuant to this section for a designated sewer system shall not be liable for claims by past or current ratepayers, by those affected by the sewer service provided by the designated sewer system, or for enforcement actions taken by the state board in any of the following circumstances:

(1) If good faith, reasonable effort, and ordinary care were used by the administrator to assume possession of, or to operate, the sewer service provider.

(2) For any injury or damages that occurred before the commencement of the operation period.

(3) For injury, violations, or damages after the administrator has assumed control of the designated system until the necessary upgrades to the infrastructure or managerial responsibilities have been completed to become an adequate sewer system.

(k) This section does not limit or supersede any other law authorizing claims against the state board or providing a defense to liability, and shall not be construed to create any new or expanded basis for liability.

(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Relieve a
 designated sewer system or any other entity from complying with any provision of federal or state law, including those pertaining to water quality.

(2) Impair any cause of action by the Attorney General, a district attorney, a city attorney, or other public prosecutor, or impair any other action or proceeding brought by, or on behalf of, a regulatory agency against a designated sewer system.

(3) Impair any claim alleging the taking of property without compensation within the meaning of either the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 19 of
 Article I of the California Constitution.

(4) Relieve any person or entity from liability for action or inaction in bad faith, or without reasonable effort or ordinary care.

(m) Nothing in this section shall absolve, indemnify, or protect a prior operator, designated sewer system, or individual from liability based on an act or failure to act prior to the operation period.

(n) Administrative and managerial contracts pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and may be awarded on a noncompetitive bid basis as necessary to implement the purposes of this section.

(o) This section does not apply to a charter city, charter county, or charter city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 505, Sec. 3.   (AB 805)   Effective September 24, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Onsite Sewage Treatment Systems [13290. - 13291.7.]

13290.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Local agency” means any of the following entities:

(1) A city, county, or city and county.

(2) A special district formed pursuant to general law or special act for the local performance of functions regarding onsite sewage treatment systems within limited boundaries.

(b) “Onsite sewage treatment systems” includes individual disposal systems, community collection and disposal systems, and alternative collection and disposal systems that use subsurface disposal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13291.

(a) On or before January 1, 2004, the state board, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, the California Coastal Commission, the California Conference of Directors of Environmental Health, counties, cities, and other interested parties, shall adopt regulations or standards for the permitting and operation of all of the following onsite sewage treatment systems in the state and shall apply those regulations or standards commencing six months after their adoptions:

(1) Any system that is constructed or replaced.

(2) Any system that is subject to a major repair.

(3) Any system that pools or discharges to the surface.

(4) Any system that, in the judgment of a regional board or authorized local agency, discharges waste that has the reasonable potential to cause a violation of water quality objectives, or to impair present or future beneficial uses of water, to cause pollution, nuisance, or contamination of the waters of the state.

(b) Regulations or standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a), shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Minimum operating requirements that may include siting, construction, and performance requirements.

(2) Requirements for onsite sewage treatment systems adjacent to impaired waters identified
 pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 303 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d)).

(3) Requirements authorizing a qualified local agency to implement those requirements adopted under this chapter within its jurisdiction if that local agency requests that authorization.

(4) Requirements for corrective action when onsite sewage treatment systems fail to meet the requirements or standards.

(5) Minimum requirements for monitoring used to determine system or systems performance, if applicable.

(6) Exemption criteria to be established by regional boards.

(7) Requirements for determining a system that is subject to a major repair, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) This chapter does not diminish or otherwise affect the authority of a local agency to carry out laws, other than this chapter, that relate to onsite sewage treatment systems.

(d) This chapter does not preempt any regional board or local agency from adopting or retaining standards for onsite sewage treatment systems that are more protective of the public health or the environment than this chapter.

(e) Each regional board shall incorporate the regulations or standards adopted pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) into the appropriate regional water quality control plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 26.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13291.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to assist private property owners with existing systems who incur costs as a result of the implementation of the regulations established under this section by encouraging the state board to make loans under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 13475) to local agencies to assist private property owners whose cost of compliance with these regulations exceeds one-half of one percent of the current assessed value of the property on which the onsite sewage system is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13291.7.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the land use authority of any city, county, or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.7. Fairness and Due Process [13292. - 13292.]

13292.

(a) It is the responsibility of the state board to provide guidance to the regional boards in matters of procedure, as well as policy and regulation. In order to ensure that regional boards are providing fair, timely, and equal access to all participants in regional board proceedings, the state board shall undertake a review of the regional boards’ public participation procedures. As part of the review process, and upon request by the state board, the regional boards shall solicit comments from participants in their proceedings. Upon completion of the review, the state board shall report to the Legislature regarding its findings and include recommendations to improve regional board public participation processes.

(b) (1) The state board shall provide annual training to regional board members to improve public participation and adjudication procedures at the regional level.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall be implemented only during fiscal years for which funding is provided for the purposes of that paragraph in the annual Budget Act or in another statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Enforcement and Implementation [13300. - 13365.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administrative Enforcement and Remedies [13300. - 13308.]

13300.

Whenever a regional board finds that a discharge of waste is taking place or threatening to take place that violates or will violate requirements prescribed by the regional board, or the state board, or that the waste collection, treatment, or disposal facilities of a discharger are approaching capacity, the board may require the discharger to submit for approval of the board, with such modifications as it may deem necessary, a detailed time schedule of specific actions the discharger shall take in order to correct or prevent a violation of requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1288.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.

When a regional board finds that a discharge of waste is taking place, or threatening to take place, in violation of requirements or discharge prohibitions prescribed by the regional board or the state board, the board may issue an order to cease and desist and direct that those persons not complying with the requirements or discharge prohibitions (a) comply forthwith, (b) comply in accordance with a time schedule set by the board, or (c) in the event of a threatened violation, take appropriate remedial or preventive action. In the event of an existing or threatened violation of waste discharge requirements in the operation of a community sewer system, cease and desist orders may restrict or prohibit the volume, type, or concentration of waste that might be added to that system by dischargers who did not discharge into the system prior to the issuance of the cease and desist order. Cease and desist orders may be issued directly by a board, after notice and hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 420, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.1.

The regional board shall render to persons against whom a cease and desist order is issued pursuant to Section 13301 all possible assistance in making available current information on successful and economical water quality control programs, as such information is developed by the state board pursuant to Section 13167, and information and assistance in applying for federal and state funds necessary to comply with the cease and desist order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1464.)
-------------------------------------------

13303.

Cease and desist orders of the board shall become effective and final upon issuance thereof. Copies shall be served forthwith by personal service, certified mail, or by any method of physical delivery that provides a receipt, upon the person being charged with the violation of the requirements, and by first class or electronic mail upon other affected persons who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy. For purposes of this section, “physical delivery that provides a receipt” includes physical delivery methods that provide electronic confirmation of delivery to the intended address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 158, Sec. 6.   (SB 756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

13304.

(a) A person who has discharged or discharges waste into the waters of this state in violation of any waste discharge requirement or other order or prohibition issued by a regional board or the state board, or who has caused or permitted, causes or permits, or threatens to cause or permit any waste to be discharged or deposited where it is, or probably will be, discharged into the waters of the state and creates, or threatens to create, a condition of pollution or nuisance, shall, upon order of the regional board, clean up the waste or abate the effects of the waste, or, in the case of threatened pollution or nuisance, take other necessary remedial action, including, but not limited to, overseeing cleanup and abatement
 efforts. A cleanup and abatement order issued by the state board or a regional board may require the provision of, or payment for, uninterrupted replacement water service, which may include wellhead treatment, to each affected public water supplier or private well owner. Upon failure of a person to comply with the cleanup or abatement order, the Attorney General, at the request of the board, shall petition the superior court for that county for the issuance of an injunction requiring the person to comply with the order. In the suit, the court shall have jurisdiction to grant a prohibitory or mandatory injunction, either preliminary or permanent, as the facts may warrant.

(b) (1) The regional board may expend available moneys to perform any cleanup, abatement, or remedial work required under the circumstances set
 forth in subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, supervision of cleanup and abatement activities that, in its judgment, is required by the magnitude of the endeavor or the urgency for prompt action to prevent substantial pollution, nuisance, or injury to any waters of the state. The action may be taken in default of, or in addition to, remedial work by the waste discharger or other persons, and regardless of whether injunctive relief is being sought.

(2) The regional board may perform the work itself, or with the cooperation of any other governmental agency, and may use rented tools or equipment, either with operators furnished or unoperated. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the regional board may enter into oral contracts for the work, and the contracts, whether written or oral, may include provisions for equipment rental
 and in addition the furnishing of labor and materials necessary to accomplish the work. The contracts shall not be subject to approval by the Department of General Services.
